ext/spell/ar.aff
FLAG	long
#أنتِ-أنتما-أنتم
SFX	5x	Y	21	
SFX	5x	أ	ئيه/Jbh0X0	أ	
SFX	5x	اء	ائيه/Jbh0X0	اء	
SFX	5x	ي	يه/Jbh0X0	ي	
SFX	5x	ءى	ءيه/Jbh0X0	ءى	
SFX	5x	أى	أيه/Jbh0X0	[ت]أى	
SFX	5x	أى	أيه/Jbh0X0	[^ت]أى	
SFX	5x	0	يه/Jbh0X0	[^أءاآيى]	
SFX	5x	أ	ؤاه/Jbh0X0	أ	
SFX	5x	اء	اءاه/Jbh0X0	اء	
SFX	5x	ي	ياه/Jbh0X0	ي	
SFX	5x	ءى	ءياه/Jbh0X0	ءى	
SFX	5x	أى	أياه/Jbh0X0	[ت]أى	
SFX	5x	أى	أياه/Jbh0X0	[^ت]أى	
SFX	5x	0	اه/Jbh0X0	[^أءاآيى]	
SFX	5x	أ	ؤوه/Jbh0X0	أ	
SFX	5x	اء	اؤوه/Jbh0X0	اء	
SFX	5x	ي	وه/Jbh0X0	ي	
SFX	5x	ءى	ءوه/Jbh0X0	ءى	
SFX	5x	أى	أوه/Jbh0X0	[ت]أى	
SFX	5x	أى	أوه/Jbh0X0	[^ت]أى	
SFX	5x	0	وه/Jbh0X0	[^أءيى]	
#أنتن
SFX	6x	Y	7	
SFX	6x	أ	ؤنه/Jbh0X0	أ	
SFX	6x	اء	أنه/Jbh0X0	اء	
SFX	6x	ي	ينه/Jbh0X0	ي	
SFX	6x	ءى	ءينه/Jbh0X0	ءى	
SFX	6x	أى	أينه/Jbh0X0	[ت]أى	
SFX	6x	أى	أينه/Jbh0X0	[^ت]أى	
SFX	6x	0	نه/Jbh0X0	[^أءيى]	

#مجموعة-لواحق-الأمر-الثالثة،-الصنف-الأول-#SFX---01/01/01-=-710-711-712
#يتعلق-الأمر-هنا-بالأفعال-التالية:39-40-41-45-117-119-120-126

#أنتَ
SFX	1y	Y	7	
SFX	1y	أ	ئه/Jah0X0	أ	
SFX	1y	اء	ئه/Jah0X0	اء	
SFX	1y	0	ه/Jah0X0	ي	
SFX	1y	0	ه/Jbh0X0	ي	
SFX	1y	أى	إه/Jeh0X0	أى	
SFX	1y	أى	ه/Jah0X0	أى	
SFX	1y	0	ه/Jah0X0	[^أيءى]	
#أنتِ-أنتما-أنتم
SFX	2y	Y	21	
SFX	2y	أ	ئيه/Jah0X0	أ	
SFX	2y	اء	يئيه/Jah0X0	اء	
SFX	2y	0	يه/Jah0X0	ي	
SFX	2y	0	يه/Jbh0X0	ي	
SFX	2y	أى	إيه/Jeh0X0	أى	
SFX	2y	أى	يه/Jah0X0	أى	
SFX	2y	0	يه/Jah0X0	[^أيءى]	
SFX	2y	أ	ئاه/Jah0X0	أ	
SFX	2y	اء	يئاه/Jah0X0	اء	
SFX	2y	0	اه/Jah0X0	ي	
SFX	2y	0	ياه/Jbh0X0	ي	
SFX	2y	أى	إياه/Jeh0X0	أى	
SFX	2y	أى	ياه/Jah0X0	أى	
SFX	2y	0	اه/Jah0X0	[^أيءى]	
SFX	2y	أ	ئوه/Jah0X0	أ	
SFX	2y	اء	يئوه/Jah0X0	اء	
SFX	2y	0	وه/Jah0X0	ي	
SFX	2y	0	وه/Jbh0X0	ي	
SFX	2y	أى	أوه/Jeh0X0	أى	
SFX	2y	أى	وه/Jah0X0	أى	
SFX	2y	0	وه/Jah0X0	[^أيءى]	
#أنتن
SFX	3y	Y	6	
SFX	3y	أ	ئنه/Jah0X0	أ	
SFX	3y	اء	ئنه/Jah0X0	اء	
SFX	3y	0	ينه/Jbh0X0	ي	
SFX	3y	أى	إينه/Jeh0X0	أى	
SFX	3y	أى	ينه/Jah0X0	أى	
SFX	3y	0	نه/Jah0X0	[^أيءى]	

############لواحق#المضارع--عاقل####################

#عاقل.ني/ي:نا:ك:كما:كم:كن:هم:هن
	
#أنا-نحن-أنتَ	
SFX	A1	Y	84	
SFX	A1	أ	ؤه/AaAeAih0d0e0f0g0i0X0	أ
SFX	A1	أ	أه/AaAmAqh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	أ
SFX	A1	ئ	ؤه/AaAeAih0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ئ
SFX	A1	ئ	أه/AaAmAqh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ئ
SFX	A1	اء	وؤه/AaAeAih0d0e0f0g0i0X0	اء
SFX	A1	اء	وءه/AaAmAqh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	اء
SFX	A1	ءى	ئيه/AaAeAiAmAqh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ءى
SFX	A1	أى	ئيه/AaAeAiAmAqh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[ت]أى
SFX	A1	أى	ئيه/AaAeAiAmAqh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^ت]أى
SFX	A1	آ	ؤوه/AaAeAiAmAqh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	آ
SFX	A1	ا	وه/AaAeAiAmAqh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^ي]ا
SFX	A1	ا	يه/AaAeAiAmAqh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	يا
SFX	A1	و	وه/AaAeAiAmAqh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	و
SFX	A1	ى	يه/AaAeAiAmAqh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^أء]ى
SFX	A1	ي	اه/AaAeAiAmAqh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^ئ]ي
SFX	A1	ئي	آه/AaAeAiAmAqh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[ئ]ي
SFX	A1	اء	ؤه/AaAqh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	اء
SFX	A1	ءى	ئه/AaAqh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ءى
SFX	A1	أى	ئه/AaAqh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[ت]أى
SFX	A1	أى	ئه/AaAqh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^ت]أى
SFX	A1	آ	ؤه/AaAqh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	آ
SFX	A1	ا	ه/AaAqh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^ي]ا
SFX	A1	ا	ه/AaAqh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	يا
SFX	A1	و	ه/AaAqh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	و
SFX	A1	ى	ه/AaAqh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^أء]ى
SFX	A1	ي	ه/AaAqh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^ئ]ي
SFX	A1	ئي	أه/AaAqh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[ئ]ي
SFX	A1	0	ه/AaAeAiAmAqh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^أئءاآيوى]
SFX	A1	أ	ؤه/AbAfAjh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	أ
SFX	A1	أ	أه/AbAnArh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	أ
SFX	A1	ئ	ؤه/AbAfAjh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ئ
SFX	A1	ئ	أه/AbAnArh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ئ
SFX	A1	اء	وؤه/AbAfAjh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	اء
SFX	A1	اء	وءه/AbAnArh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	اء
SFX	A1	ءى	ئيه/AbAfAjAnArh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ءى
SFX	A1	أى	ئيه/AbAfAjAnArh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[ت]أى
SFX	A1	أى	ئيه/AbAfAjAnArh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^ت]أى
SFX	A1	آ	ؤوه/AbAfAjAnArh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	آ
SFX	A1	ا	وه/AbAfAjAnArh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^ي]ا
SFX	A1	ا	يه/AbAfAjAnArh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	يا
SFX	A1	و	وه/AbAfAjAnArh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	و
SFX	A1	ى	يه/AbAfAjAnArh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^أء]ى
SFX	A1	ي	اه/AbAfAjAnArh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^ئ]ي
SFX	A1	ئي	آه/AbAfAjAnArh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[ئ]ي
SFX	A1	اء	ؤه/AbArh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	اء
SFX	A1	ءى	ئه/AbArh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	ءى
SFX	A1	أى	ئه/AbArh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[ت]أى
SFX	A1	أى	ئه/AbArh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^ت]أى
SFX	A1	آ	ؤه/AbArh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	آ
SFX	A1	ا	ه/AbArh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^ي]ا
SFX	A1	ا	ه/AbArh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	يا
SFX	A1	و	ه/AbArh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	و
SFX	A1	ى	ه/AbArh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^أء]ى
SFX	A1	ي	ه/AbArh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^ئ]ي
SFX	A1	ئي	أه/AbArh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[ئ]ي
SFX	A1	0	ه/AbAfAjAnArh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	[^أئءاآيوى]
SFX	A1	أ	ؤه/AcAgAkh0b0c0i0X0	أ
SFX	A1	أ	أه/AcAoAsh0b0c0i0X0	أ
SFX	A1	ئ	ؤه/AcAgAkh0b0c0i0X0	ئ
SFX	A1	ئ	أه/AcAoAsh0b0c0i0X0	ئ
SFX	A1	اء	وؤه/AcAgAkh0b0c0i0X0	اء
SFX	A1	اء	وءه/AcAoAsh0b0c0i0X0	اء
SFX	A1	ءى	ئيه/AcAgAkAoAsh0b0c0i0X0	ءى
SFX	A1	أى	ئيه/AcAgAkAoAsh0b0c0i0X0	[ت]أى
SFX	A1	أى	ئيه/AcAgAkAoAsh0b0c0i0X0	[^ت]أى
SFX	A1	آ	ؤوه/AcAgAkAoAsh0b0c0i0X0	آ
SFX	A1	ا	وه/AcAgAkAoAsh0b0c0i0X0	[^ي]ا
SFX	A1	ا	يه/AcAgAkAoAsh0b0c0i0X0	يا
SFX	A1	و	وه/AcAgAkAoAsh0b0c0i0X0	و
SFX	A1	ى	يه/AcAgAkAoAsh0b0c0i0X0	[^أء]ى
SFX	A1	ي	اه/AcAgAkAoAsh0b0c0i0X0	[^ئ]ي
SFX	A1	ئي	آه/AcAgAkAoAsh0b0c0i0X0	[ئ]ي
SFX	A1	اء	ؤه/AcAsh0b0c0i0X0	اء
SFX	A1	ءى	ئه/AcAsh0b0c0i0X0	ءى
SFX	A1	أى	ئه/AcAsh0b0c0i0X0	[ت]أى
SFX	A1	أى	ئه/AcAsh0b0c0i0X0	[^ت]أى
SFX	A1	آ	ؤه/AcAsh0b0c0i0X0	آ
SFX	A1	ا	ه/AcAsh0b0c0i0X0	[^ي]ا
SFX	A1	ا	ه/AcAsh0b0c0i0X0	يا
SFX	A1	و	ه/AcAsh0b0c0i0X0	و
SFX	A1	ى	ه/AcAsh0b0c0i0X0	[^أء]ى
SFX	A1	ي	ه/AcAsh0b0c0i0X0	[^ئ]ي
SFX	A1	ئي	أه/AcAsh0b0c0i0X0	[ئ]ي
SFX	A1	0	ه/AcAgAkAoAsh0b0c0i0X0	[^أئءاآيوى]
#أنا-نحن-أنتَ	
SFX	A?	Y	3	
SFX	A?	0	ه/AaAqh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	.
SFX	A?	0	ه/AbArh0d0e0f0g0i0X0	.
SFX	A?	0	ه/AcAsh0b0c0i0X0	.
	
