ext/spell/ar.dic
ابتدأ/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7s2s3s4s5y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8a4a5a61o2o3o4o5o6o7o1y2y3y1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8m
أبذأ/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7s2y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8a41o2o3o4o5o6o7o1y2y3y1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8m
اتكأ/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7s2y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8a41o2o3o4o5o6o7o1y2y3y1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8m
أجذل/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7w1w2w3a1a2a3a4a5a6a7a8O1O2O3O4O5O6O7W1W2W3A1A2A3A4A5A6A7A8
أجز/o1o7w1w3a?a3a&a$a8O1O7W1W3A?A3A&A$A8
أحقق/o1o7w1w3a?a3a&a$a8O1O7W1W3A?A3A&A$A8Y0
اختبأ/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7s2s3s4s5y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8a4a5a61o2o3o4o5o6o7o1y2y3y1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8m
أخضع/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7w1w2w3a1a2a3a4a5a6a7a8O1O2O3O4O5O6O7W1W2W3A1A2A3A4A5A6A7A8
أدر/o1o7w1w3a?a3a&a$a8O1O7W1W3A?A3A&A$A8
أرث/o1o7w1w3a?a3a&a$a8O1O7W1W3A?A3A&A$A8
أرجأ/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7s2s3s4s5y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8a4a5a61o2o3o4o5o6o7o1y2y3y1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8m
أرمى/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7s1s2s3s4s5s6s7w1w2w3a1a2a3a4a5a6a7a8g1g2g3g4g5g6g7g8O1O2O3O4O5O6O7W1W2W3A1A2A3A4A5A6A7A8
أزلل/o1o7w1w3a?a3a&a$a8O1O7W1W3A?A3A&A$A8Y0
استحثث/o1o7w1w3a?a3a&a$a8O1O7W1W3A?A3A&A$A8Y0
استرجع/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7w1w2w3a1a2a3a4a5a6a7a8O1O2O3O4O5O6O7W1W2W3A1A2A3A4A5A6A7A8
استعض/o1o7w1w3a?a3a&a$a8O1O7W1W3A?A3A&A$A8
استمرأ/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7s2s3s4s5y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8a4a5a61o2o3o4o5o6o7o1y2y3y1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8m
استمل/o1o7w1w3a?a3a&a$a8O1O7W1W3A?A3A&A$A8
استنطق/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7w1w2w3a1a2a3a4a5a6a7a8O1O2O3O4O5O6O7W1W2W3A1A2A3A4A5A6A7A8
أصت/o1o7w1w3a?a3a&a$a8O1O7W1W3A?A3A&A$A8
أصدأ/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7s2s3s4s5y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8a4a5a61o2o3o4o5o6o7o1y2y3y1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8m
اصطنع/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7w1w2w3a1a2a3a4a5a6a7a8O1O2O3O4O5O6O7W1W2W3A1A2A3A4A5A6A7A8
أظلل/o1o7w1w3a?a3a&a$a8O1O7W1W3A?A3A&A$A8Y0
أعش/o1o7w1w3a?a3a&a$a8O1O7W1W3A?A3A&A$A8
أعمر/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7w1w2w3a1a2a3a4a5a6a7a8O1O2O3O4O5O6O7W1W2W3A1A2A3A4A5A6A7A8
اغتل/o1o7w1w3a?a3a&a$a8O1O7W1W3A?A3A&A$A8
أقبر/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7w1w2w3a1a2a3a4a5a6a7a8O1O2O3O4O5O6O7W1W2W3A1A2A3A4A5A6A7A8
اقتد/o1o7w1w3a?a3a&a$a8O1O7W1W3A?A3A&A$A8
أكفأ/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7s2s3s4s5y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8a4a5a61o2o3o4o5o6o7o1y2y3y1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8m
التجأ/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7s2y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8a41o2o3o4o5o6o7o1y2y3y1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8m
ألحف/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7w1w2w3a1a2a3a4a5a6a7a8O1O2O3O4O5O6O7W1W2W3A1A2A3A4A5A6A7A8
ألع/o1o7w1w3a?a3a&a$a8O1O7W1W3A?A3A&A$A8
أمصص/o1o7w1w3a?a3a&a$a8O1O7W1W3A?A3A&A$A8Y0
أنبت/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7w1w2w3a1a2a3a4a5a6a7a8O1O2O3O4O5O6O7W1W2W3A1A2A3A4A5A6A7A8
أنضض/o1o7w1w3a?a3a&a$a8O1O7W1W3A?A3A&A$A8Y0
انطفأ/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7s2y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8a41o2o3o4o5o6o7o1y2y3y1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8m
انفقأ/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7s2y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8a41o2o3o4o5o6o7o1y2y3y1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8m
انكفأ/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7s2y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8a41o2o3o4o5o6o7o1y2y3y1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8m
أنهج/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7w1w2w3a1a2a3a4a5a6a7a8O1O2O3O4O5O6O7W1W2W3A1A2A3A4A5A6A7A8
أهمأ/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7s2s3s4s5y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8a4a5a61o2o3o4o5o6o7o1y2y3y1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8m
أوبأ/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7s2y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8a41o2o3o4o5o6o7o1y2y3y1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8m
أوقر/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7w1w2w3a1a2a3a4a5a6a7a8O1O2O3O4O5O6O7W1W2W3A1A2A3A4A5A6A7A8
أومأ/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7s2y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8a41o2o3o4o5o6o7o1y2y3y1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8m
ائتضض/o1o7p1p7w4w6a?a3a&a$a8d?d3d&d$d8O1O7W4W6A?A3A&A$A8Y0
بلبل/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7w1w2w3a1a2a3a4a5a6a7a8O1O2O3O4O5O6O7W1W2W3A1A2A3A4A5A6A7A8
ترك/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7w4w5w6a1a2a3a4a5a6a7a8O1O2O3O4O5O6O7W4W5W6A1A2A3A4A5A6A7A8
تلل/o1o7w4w6a?a3a&a$a8O1O7W4W6A?A3A&A$A8Y0
تلمس/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7w1w2w3a1a2a3a4a5a6a7a8O1O2O3O4O5O6O7W1W2W3A1A2A3A4A5A6A7A8
ثلب/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7w4w5w6a1a2a3a4a5a6a7a8O1O2O3O4O5O6O7W4W5W6A1A2A3A4A5A6A7A8
جشأ/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7s2y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8a41o2o3o4o5o6o7o1y2y3y1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8m
حاجج/o1o7w1w3a?a3a&a$a8O1O7W1W3A?A3A&A$A8Y0
حب/o2o3o4o5o6w1w2a1a2a4a5a6a7O2O3O4O5O6W1W2A1A2A4A5A6A71A2A
حش/o1o7w1w3a?a3a&a$a8O1O7W1W3A?A3A&A$A8
حي/s1s2s3s4s5s6s7y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m81s2s3s4s5s6s7s1y2y3y1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8m
حيد/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7w1w2w3a1a2a3a4a5a6a7a8O1O2O3O4O5O6O7W1W2W3A1A2A3A4A5A6A7A8
خبأ/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7s2s3s4s5y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8a4a5a61o2o3o4o5o6o7o1y2y3y1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8m
خصص/o1o7w4w6a?a3a&a$a8O1O7W4W6A?A3A&A$A8Y0
دامس/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7w1w2w3a1a2a3a4a5a6a7a8O1O2O3O4O5O6O7W1W2W3A1A2A3A4A5A6A7A8
ذحح/o1o7w4w6a?a3a&a$a8O1O7W4W6A?A3A&A$A8Y0
راطن/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7w1w2w3a1a2a3a4a5a6a7a8O1O2O3O4O5O6O7W1W2W3A1A2A3A4A5A6A7A8
رشش/o1o7w4w6a?a3a&a$a8O1O7W4W6A?A3A&A$A8Y0
رهل/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7w1w2w3a1a2a3a4a5a6a7a8O1O2O3O4O5O6O7W1W2W3A1A2A3A4A5A6A7A8
زنن/o1o7w4w6a?a3a&a$a8O1O7W4W6A?A3A&A$A8Y0
سائل/w1w2w3a1a2a3a4a5a6a7a8W1W2W3A1A2A3A4A5A6A7A8
شاقق/o1o7w1w3a?a3a&a$a8O1O7W1W3A?A3A&A$A8Y0
شاكى/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7w1w2w3a1a2a3a4a5a6a7a8g1g2g3g4g5g6g7g8O1O2O3O4O5O6O7W1W2W3A1A2A3A4A5A6A7A8
صد/o1o7w1w3a?a3a&a$a8O1O7W1W3A?A3A&A$A8
صد/o2o3o4o5o6w1w2a1a2a4a5a6a7O2O3O4O5O6W1W2A1A2A4A5A6A7
ضمم/o1o7w4w6a?a3a&a$a8O1O7W4W6A?A3A&A$A8Y0
ضوأ/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7s2s3s4s5y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8a4a5a61o2o3o4o5o6o7o1y2y3y1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8m
طأطأ/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8a4a5a61o2o3o4o5o6o7o1y2y3y1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8m
طر/o2o3o4o5o6w1w2a1a2a4a5a6a7O2O3O4O5O6W1W2A1A2A4A5A6A7
عرم/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7w4w5w6a1a2a3a4a5a6a7a8O1O2O3O4O5O6O7W4W5W6A1A2A3A4A5A6A7A8
عضض/o1o7w4w6a?a3a&a$a8O1O7W4W6A?A3A&A$A8Y0
عي/s1s2s3s4s5s6s7y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m81s2s3s4s5s6s7s1y2y3y1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8m
غرز/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7w4w5w6a1a2a3a4a5a6a7a8O1O2O3O4O5O6O7W4W5W6A1A2A3A4A5A6A7A8
فذذ/o1o7w4w6a?a3a&a$a8O1O7W4W6A?A3A&A$A8Y0
فك/o2o3o4o5o6w1w2a1a2a4a5a6a7O2O3O4O5O6W1W2A1A2A4A5A6A7
فيأ/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7s2s3s4s5y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8a4a5a61o2o3o4o5o6o7o1y2y3y1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8m
قصص/o1o7w4w6a?a3a&a$a8O1O7W4W6A?A3A&A$A8Y0
قوت/w2a1a2a4a5a6a7W2A1A2A4A5A6A7Y0
قيأ/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7s2s3s4s5y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8a4a5a61o2o3o4o5o6o7o1y2y3y1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8m
كأكأ/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8a41o2o3o4o5o6o7o1y2y3y1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8m
لألأ/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8a4a5a61o2o3o4o5o6o7o1y2y3y1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8m
لبنن/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7w1w2w3a1a2a3a4a5a6a7a8O1O2O3O4O5O6O7W1W2W3A1A2A3A4A5A6A7A8
لح/o1o7w1w3a?a3a&a$a8O1O7W1W3A?A3A&A$A8
مأمأ/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8a41o2o3o4o5o6o7o1y2y3y1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8m
مشى/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7s1s2s3s4s5s6s7w1w2w3a1a2a3a4a5a6a7a8g1g2g3g4g5g6g7g8O1O2O3O4O5O6O7W1W2W3A1A2A3A4A5A6A7A8
ناء/s1t2t3t4t5t6s7s2y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8g41s2t3t4t5t6t7s1y2y3y1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8m
نب/o1o7w1w3a?a3a&a$a8O1O7W1W3A?A3A&A$A8
نزف/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7w4w5w6a1a2a3a4a5a6a7a8O1O2O3O4O5O6O7W4W5W6A1A2A3A4A5A6A7A8
هبهب/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7w1w2w3a1a2a3a4a5a6a7a8O1O2O3O4O5O6O7W1W2W3A1A2A3A4A5A6A7A8
واكأ/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8a41o2o3o4o5o6o7o1y2y3y1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8m
وأوأ/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8a41o2o3o4o5o6o7o1y2y3y1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8m
وصم/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7w1w2w3a1a2a3a4a5a6a7a8O1O2O3O4O5O6O7W1W2W3A1A2A3A4A5A6A7A8
وطأ/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7s2s3s4s5y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8a4a5a61o2o3o4o5o6o7o1y2y3y1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8m
حادد/o1o7w1w3a?a3a&a$a8O1O7W1W3A?A3A&A$A8Y0
أبدأ/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7s2s3s4s5y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8a4a5a61o2o3o4o5o6o7o1y2y3y1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8m
استبرأ/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7s2y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8a41o2o3o4o5o6o7o1y2y3y1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8m
اهترا/o1o2o3o4o5o6o7s2y1y2y3m1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8a41o2o3o4o5o6o7o1y2y3y1m2m3m4m5m6m7m8m
